Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-263
Rules and regulations regarding preambles.

In addition to the general requirements set forth in subsection (1) of section 86-269, the commission specifically shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations as necessary regarding preambles to intrastate pay-per-call programs consistent with 16 C.F.R. 308.1 through 308.9, as such regulations existed on January 1, 2002, pertaining to preamble requirements for interstate pay-per-call programs.

Laws 1993, LB 42, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1104;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 125.